Ohio, session 136, HB50.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Ohio:
S 1. That section 5533.106 of the Revised Code be enacted to read as follows:
ECTION
Sec. 5533.106. In addition to any other name prescribed in the Revised Code or otherwise,
the northbound and southbound lanes of state route number forty-seven between McGreevey road
and Long road, in Darke county, shall be known as the "PFC John Wayne Richard Memorial
Highway."
The director of transportation may erect suitable markers along the highway indicating its
name.

H. B. No. 50 136th G.A.
Speaker ___________________ of the House of Representatives.
President ___________________ of the Senate.
Passed ________________________, 20____
Approved ________________________, 20____
Governor.

H. B. No. 50 136th G.A.
The section numbering of law of a general and permanent nature is
complete and in conformity with the Revised Code.
Director, Legislative Service Commission.
Filed in the office of the Secretary of State at Columbus, Ohio, on the ____
day of ___________, A. D. 20____.
Secretary of State.
File No. _________ Effective Date ___________________